Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Admission to Liberties of the Jail Yard; Close Jail Executions; Jail Bonds

§§ 3621-3628.
Repealed.
1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 3629.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 3630-3638.
Repealed.
1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.